Utah statutes.
63M-1-601.   Purpose.

The purpose of this part is to establish an advisory council on science and technology to assist in the development of programs, communication, and use of science and technology in governmental organizations in the state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

